Utah statutes.
41-6a-1201.   Driving on tracks.

(1) The operator of a vehicle proceeding on any track in front of a railroad train on a highway shall remove the vehicle from the track as soon as practicable after signal from the operator of the train.

(2)  When a railroad train has started to cross an intersection, an operator of a vehicle may not drive:

(a)  on or across the tracks; or

(b)  in the path of the train within the intersection in front of the train.

